Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1050.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definitions of "games of chance" and "passive selection device" in section 103 of the act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 The following words and phrases when used in this act shall, except as provided under section 902, have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Electronic pull-tab device." An electronic device used by a player solely to facilitate the play of an electronic pull-tab game. For the purpose of this definition, the following shall apply:(1) An e lectronic pull-tab device shall be a cabinet or portable tablet, not including a mobile phone or other personal computing device.(2) An electronic pull-tab device shall be incorporated into an electronic pull-tab system and may not be used for personal communication or capable of connection to an unsecured or publicly accessible communication network."Electronic pull-tab game." An electronic or digital representation of a pull-tab game played on an electronic pull-tab device. For the purpose of this definition, an electronic pull-tab game may not replicate the game of keno, blackjack, roulette, poker, craps or any other casino-style table game. The reveal of numbers or symbols in an electronic pull-tab game may incorporate an entertainment or bonus theme if all of the following apply:(1) The reveal does not include spinning reels that resemble a slot machine.(2) The reveal theme does not require an additional consideration or award any prize other than the predetermined prize associated with the winning electronic pull-tab ticket."Electronic pull-tab system." Electronic pull-tab games, 20250HB1050PN1122 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electronic pull-tab devices and an associated computer or device, including all related hardware and software, used to facilitate the play of electronic pull-tab games and store and manage game data between and from points-of-sale.* * *"Event game." A pull -tab game, played with or without a seal card, in which certain prizes are determined by the draw of a bingo ball or some other approved specified event which randomly selects numbers or symbols that correspond to the numbers or symbols printed by the manufacturer on the pull-tab. For the purpose of this definition, the following shall apply:(1) An event pull-tab may not be both an instant winner and a hold card.(2) A game may not contain duplicate hold combinations. If a game contains multiple sets of hold combinations, each set shall be distinguishable by color or distinguishing features.(3) An event pull-tab may contain more than one hold combination.(4) The number of winners and prize amounts shall be built into the payout structure for the game by the manufacturer.* * *"Games of chance." Punchboards, daily drawings, weekly drawings, 50/50 drawings, raffles, tavern games, pools, race night games and [pull-tabs] pull-tab games, including paper and electronic pull-tab games, event games, subset pull-tab games, pick-board games and progressive pull-tab games, as defined in this act, provided that no such game shall be played by or with the assistance of any mechanical or electrical devices or media 20250HB1050PN1122 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other than a dispensing machine [or], passive selection device or electronic pull-tab system and further provided [that] the particular chance taken by any person in any such game shall not be made contingent upon any other occurrence or the winning of any other contest, but shall be determined solely at the discretion of the purchaser. This definition shall not be construed to authorize any other form of gambling currently prohibited under any provision of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) or authorized under 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements). Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize games commonly known as "slot machines" or "video poker" or other games regulated by the Pennsylvania Gaming Control Board.* * *"Passive selection device." A device which is used to hold or denote the universe of possible winning numbers or entrants in a daily drawing, bingo game, event game or raffle. Such a device may not have the capability of being utilized to conduct or aid in the conducting of unauthorized or illegal forms of gambling."Pick-board game." A pu ll-tab game played with a flare containing more than one sealed tab that when opened reveal predesignated winning numbers or symbols. For the purpose of this definition, certain tickets in the game shall bear a designation providing one or more players the opportunity to win a prize by selecting which sealed tab to open from among the sealed tabs on the flare.* * *"Progressive pull-tab game." A pull- tab game played with a seal card or multiple seal cards designed by the manufacturer to include a jackpot prize that is carried over to a subsequent 20250HB1050PN1122 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deal of pull-tab tickets of the same form number if the jackpot prize is not won. For the purpose of this definition, the amount dedicated to the progressive jackpot shall be predetermined by the manufacturer and built into the payout structure for the game, however, the progressive jackpot does not need to be a predetermined amount.* * *"Pull-tab game." A deal of pull-tab tickets with a finite number of winning and losing tickets and a predetermined prize structure. For the purpose of this definition, each pull-tab within a game shall have a unique serial number and be sold for the same price.* * *"Subset pull-tab game." A pull-tab game consisting of a single pull-tab deal, with all tickets bearing the same serial number, that is packaged by the manufacturer into smaller subsets, each of which is played separately. For the purpose of this definition, the following shall apply:(1) Each subset shall have a corresponding flare, which shall contain at least one sealed tab. (2) Certain tickets in each subset shall bear a designation providing one or more players the opportunity to win a prize when the sealed tab or tabs are opened. * * *Section 2. Section 302(a) and (b) of the act are amended to read:Section 302. Prize limits.(a) Individual prize limit.--Except as provided under subsections [(d) and (d.1)] (d), (d.1), (f) and (h), the maximum prize which may be awarded for any single chance shall be 20250HB1050PN1122 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [$2,000] $5,000.(b) Aggregate prize limit.--No more than [$35,000] $70,000 in prizes shall be awarded from [games of chance] a game of chance not subject to the limitation under section 303(c) by a licensed eligible organization in any seven-day period.* * *Section 3. Section 303(b) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 303. Sales limited.* * *(b) Limitation.--No game of chance, other than a raffle under section 302(d), a progressive pull-tab game or subset pull-tab game, which is sold, offered for sale or furnished to a licensed eligible organization for use within this Commonwealth, shall contain, permit, depict or designate a single prize having a prize limit in excess of [$2,000.] $5,000.(c) Maximum prize.--No pull-tab game, electronic pull-tab game or punchboard, which is sold, offered for sale or furnished to a licensed eligible organization for use within this Commonwealth, shall have a single chance costing more than $10.Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 303.2. Pull-tab deals. (a) Sale or transfer.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit a person from selling or transferring to another person for use within this Commonwealth a pull-tab deal or electronic pull-tab game that contains more than 4,000 individual pull-tabs.(b) Paper pull-tabs.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose a restriction on the number of paper pull- tabs that can be put out for public play as part of a single 20250HB1050PN1122 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deal.(c) Last remaining tickets.--Nothing in this section shall prohibit a pull-tab deal from awarding a cash prize or chance at a seal prize to the purchaser of the last remaining ticket in the deal.Section 5. Section 304(g) introductory paragraph of the act is amended to read:Section 304. Distributor licenses.* * *(g) Ineligibility.--The department shall not issue or renew a distributor license for the sale of games of chance to a person, including any corporation, firm or partnership which has as an officer, director or other person in a supervisory or management position, [or] an employee eligible to make sales on behalf of the distributor or an affiliated person or entity , who:* * *Section 6. Section 305 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 305. Registration of manufacturers.* * *(c.1) Ineligibility.--The department shall not issue or renew a certificate under this section for the sale of games of chance to a person, including any corporation, firm or partnership which has as an officer, director or other person in a supervisory or management position, an employee eligible to make sales on behalf of the manufacturer or an affiliated person or entity , who: (1) has been convicted of a felony in a Federal or state court within the past five years; or20250HB1050PN1122 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) has been convicted within ten years of the date of application in a Federal or state court of a violation of any of the following:(i) this act;(ii) the act of July 10, 1981 (P.L.214, No.67), known as the Bingo Law;(iii) a gambling-related offense under 4 Pa.C.S. (relating to amusements);(iv) a gambling-related offense under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses); and(v) a Federal or state law comparable to the statutes listed under subparagraphs (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv).* * *Section 7. Section 306(a)(1) and (2) of the act are amended to read:Section 306. Regulations of department.(a) Authorization.--The department shall promulgate regulations to:(1) Impose minimum standards and restrictions applicable to games of chance manufactured for sale in this Commonwealth[, which may include standards and restrictions which specify the maximum number of chances available to be sold for any single game of chance or prize and such other standards and restrictions] as the department deems necessary for the purposes of this chapter. The department shall consider standards adopted by the [National Association of Gambling Regulatory Agencies] North American Gaming Regulators Association and other standards commonly accepted in the industry.20250HB1050PN1122 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Establish procedures by which manufacturers may register and distributors of games of chance may apply for licensure on forms which the department shall provide. Procedures shall include a requirement that manufacturer and distributor applicants provide criminal history record information obtained from the Pennsylvania State Police under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b) (relating to general regulations) for each [officer and manager of the manufacturer's or distributor's organization and for any other individual specified by the department] person specified under sections 304(g) and 305(c.1). As used in this paragraph, the term "criminal history record information" has the meaning given in 18 Pa.C.S. § 9102 (relating to definitions).* * *Section 8. Section 307(d) of the act is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 307. Licensing of eligible organizations.* * * (d) Operation.--Each licensed eligible organization shall be prohibited from the following:* * *(7) Conducting electronic pull-tab games utilizing more than the following number of devices at a location:(i) Ten devices if occupancy limits for the location are greater than 250.(ii) Seven devices if occupancy limits for the location are more than 100 and up to 250.(iii) Five devices if occupancy limits for the location are less than or equal to 100.(8) Utilizing an electronic pull-tab system that has not 20250HB1050PN1122 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 been tested by an independent gaming test laboratory approved by the department as meeting the standards adopted by the department.* * *Section 9. Section 502(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 502. Distribution of proceeds.(a) Distribution.--The proceeds from games of chance received by a club licensee shall be distributed as follows:(1) No less than [60%] 25% of the proceeds shall be paid for public interest purposes within one year of the end of the calendar year in which the proceeds were obtained.(2) No more than [40%] 75% of the proceeds obtained in a calendar year may be retained by a club licensee.* * *Section 10. Section 701(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 701. Revocation of licenses.(a) Grounds.--The following shall be grounds for suspension, revocation or nonrenewal of a license:* * *(16) Operation of an electronic pull-tab device that was not obtained from a licensed distributor.* * *Section 11. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 709. Other penalties.In addition to any other penalty specified under this chapter, a person who conducts, finances, manages, supervises, directs or owns an electronic gambling device intended for use in this Commonwealth in violation of this act shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000 for each device, which 20250HB1050PN1122 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be payable to the county where the device was operated. The Attorney General or the district attorney of the county may cause an action in equity to be brought in the name of the Commonwealth or the county, as applicable, to:(1) enjoin the operation of an electronic gambling device specified under this section;(2) request an attachment against the electronic gambling device and money within the device; and(3) recover the civil penalty specified under this section.Section 12. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1050PN1122 - 11 - 1234567891011